th: ข้อมูลสารก่อภูมิแพ้: ขึ้นฉ่ายฝรั่ง; กุ้ง; ไข่; ปลา; ถั่วลูปิน; นม; หอย; มัสตาร์ด; ถั่วเปลือกแข็ง; ถั่วลิสง; งา; ถั่วเหลือง; ซัลเฟอร์ไดออกไซด์; ซัลไฟต์; ข้าวสาลี; อื่นๆ
en: Allergen information: Celery; Crustaceans; Eggs; Fish; Lupin; Milk; Molluscs; Mustard; Nuts; Peanuts; Sesame; Soybeans; Sulfur dioxide; Sulphites; Wheat; Other
fr: Informations sur les allergènes: Céleri; Crustacés; Œufs; Poisson; Lupin; Lait; Mollusques; Moutarde; Noix; Cacahuètes; Sésame; Graines de soja; Dioxyde de soufre; Sulfites; Blé; Autre
pl: Informacje o alergenach: Seler; Skorupiaki; Jaja; Ryby; Łubin; Mleko; Mięczaki; Gorczyca; Orzechy; Orzechy ziemne; Sezam; Soja; Dwutlenek siarki; Siarczyny; Pszenica; Inne
nb: Allergeninformasjon: Selleri; Krepsdyr; Egg; Fisk; Lupin; Melk; Bløtdyr; Sennep; Nøtter; Peanøtter; Sesam; Soyabønner; Svoveldioksid; Sulfitter; Hvete; Annet
hu: Allergéninformációk: Zeller; Rákfélék; Tojás; Hal; Csillagfürt; Tej; Puhatestűek; Mustár; Diófélék; Mogyorófélék; Szezám; Szójabab; Kén-dioxid; Szulfitok; Búza; Egyéb
fi: Allergeenitiedot: Selleri; Äyriäiset; Kananmunat; Kala; Lupiini; Maito; Nilviäiset; Sinappi; Pähkinät; Maapähkinät; Seesami; Soijapavut; Rikkidioksidi; Sulfiitit; Vehnä; Muu
ro-RO: Informații alergeni: Țelină; Crustacee; Ouă; Pește; Lupin; Lapte; Moluște; Muștar; Nuci; Arahide; Susan; Soia; Dioxid de sulf; Sulfiți; Grâu; Altele
da: Oplysninger om allergener: Bladselleri; Krebsdyr; Æg; Fisk; Lupin; Mælk; Bløddyr; Sennep; Nødder; Jordnødder; Sesam; Sojabønner; Svovldioxid; Sulfitter; Hvede; Andet
bg-BG: Информация за алергени: Целина; Ракообразни; Яйца; Риба; Лупина; Мляко; Мекотели; Горчица; Ядки; Фъстъци; Сусам; Соя; Серен диоксид; Сулфити; Пшеница; Други
el: Πληροφορίες για αλλεργιογόνα: Σέλινο; Οστρακόδερμα; Αυγά; Ψάρι; Λούπινο; Γάλα; Μαλάκια; Μουστάρδα; Ξηροί καρποί; Φιστίκια; Σουσάμι; Σόγια; Διοξείδιο του θείου; Θειώδη; Σιτάρι; Άλλο
nl: Allergeneninformatie: Selderij; Schaaldieren; Eieren; Vis; Lupine; Melk; Weekdieren; Mosterd; Noten; Pinda's; Sesam; Sojabonen; Zwaveldioxide; Sulfieten; Tarwe; Andere
lt-LT: Informacija apie alergenus: Salierai; Vėžiagyviai; Kiaušiniai; Žuvis; Lubinai; Pienas; Moliuskai; Garstyčios; Riešutai; Žemės riešutai; Sezamai; Sojos; Sieros dioksidas; Sulfitai; Kviečiai; Kita
de: Informationen zu Allergenen: Sellerie; Krebstiere; Eier; Fisch; Lupine; Milch; Weichtiere; Senf; Nüsse; Erdnüsse; Sesam; Sojabohnen; Schwefeldioxid; Sulfite; Weizen; Sonstiges
cs: Informace o alergenech: Řapíkatý celer; Korýši; Vejce; Ryba; Vlčí bob; Mléko; Měkkýši; Hořčice; Ořechy; Arašídy; Sezam; Sójové boby; Oxid siřičitý; Siřičitany; Pšenice; Jiné
pt-BR: Informações sobre alérgenos: Aipo; Crustáceos; Ovos; Peixe; Tremoço; Leite; Moluscos; Mostarda; Nozes; Amendoins; Gergelim; Soja; Dióxido de enxofre; Sulfitos; Trigo; Outro
hr-HR: Informacije o alergenima: Celer; Rakovi; Jaja; Riba; Lupina; Mlijeko; Mekušci; Gorušica; Orašasti plodovi; Kikiriki; Sezam; Soja; Sumporov dioksid; Sulfiti; Pšenica; Ostalo
ja: アレルゲン情報: セロリ; 甲殻類; 卵; 魚; ルパン; ミルク; 軟体動物; からし・マスタード; ナッツ; ピーナッツ; ゴマ; 大豆; 二酸化硫黄; 亜硫酸塩; 小麦; その他
sk-SK: Informácie o alergénoch: Zeler; Kôrovce; Vajcia; Ryby; Lupina; Mlieko; Mäkkýše; Horčica; Orechy; Arašidy; Sezam; Sójové bôby; Oxid siričitý; Siričitany; Pšenica; Iné
sv: Allergeninformation: Selleri; Kräftdjur; Ägg; Fisk; Lupinböna; Mjölk; Blötdjur; Senap; Nötter; Jordnötter; Sesam; Sojabönor; Svaveldioxid; Sulfiter; Vete; Övrigt
ko: 알레르기 유발물질 정보: 셀러리; 갑각류; 달걀; 물고기; 루핀; 우유; 연체동물; 머스터드; 견과류; 땅콩; 참깨; 대두; 이산화황; 아황산염; 위트; 기타
pt-PT: Informações sobre alergénios: Aipo; Crustáceos; Ovos; Peixe; Tremoço; Leite; Moluscos; Mostarda; Frutos de casca rija; Amendoins; Sésamo; Soja; Dióxido de enxofre; Sulfitos; Trigo; Outro
zh-TW: 過敏原資訊: 西洋芹; 甲殼類; 蛋; 魚; 羽扇豆屬植物; 牛奶; 軟體動物; 芥末醬; 堅果; 花生; 芝麻; 大豆; 二氧化硫; 亞硫酸鹽; 小麥; 其他
tr: Alerjen Bilgisi: Kereviz; Kabuklular; Yumurtalar; Balık; Acı bakla; Süt; Yumuşakçalar; Hardal; Fındıklar; Fıstıklar; Susam; Soya fasulyesi; Kükürt dioksit; Sülfit; Buğday; Diğer
vi: Thông tin về chất gây dị ứng: Cần tây; Động vật giáp xác; Trứng; Cá; Đậu Lupin; Sữa; Động vật thân mềm; Mù tạt; Quả hạch; Lạc; Vừng; Đậu nành; Sulfur dioxide; Sulphite; Lúa mì; Khác
es: Información sobre alérgenos: Apio; Crustáceos; Huevos; Pez; Lupino; Leche; Moluscos; Mostaza; Nueces; Cacahuetes; Sésamo; Soja; Dióxido de azufre; Sulfitos; Trigo; Otros
ru: Информация об аллергенах: Сельдерей; Ракообразные; Яйца; Рыба; Люпин; Молоко; Моллюски; Горчица; Орехи; Арахис; Кунжут; Соевые бобы; Диоксид серы; Сульфиты; Пшеница; Другое
sl-SI: Podatki o alergenih: Listna zelena; Raki; Jajca; Ribe; Volčji bob; Mleko; Mehkužci; Gorčica; Oreški; Arašidi; Sezam; Soja; Žveplov dioksid; Sulfiti; Pšenica; Drugi
zh-CN: 过敏原信息: 芹菜; 甲壳类; 蛋; 鱼; 羽扇豆; 牛奶; 软体类; 芥末; 坚果; 花生; 芝麻; 大豆; 二氧化硫; 亚硫酸盐; 小麦; 其他
it: Informazioni sugli allergeni: Sedano; Crostacei; Uova; Pesce; Lupino; Latte; Molluschi; Senape; Frutta secca; Arachidi; Sesamo; Fagioli di soia; Diossido di zolfo; Solfiti; Grano; Altro